District of Columbia statutes.
38-2910

Procedure for adjusting appropriation in case of revenue unavailability.

If in any given fiscal year the Council finds that full funding of the Formula from local revenues is inconsistent with legal requirements for a balanced budget, the following shall apply:

(1)

The Council shall reduce the foundation level accordingly, and set a schedule for achieving or restoring full funding, however, funding shall not be less than 95% of the previous fiscal year’s funding; and

(2)

The Mayor, Council, Superintendent/CEO, and Board of Education shall use their best efforts to obtain temporary supplemental funding from other revenue sources.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 111, 45 DCR 8095
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 4002(h), 53 DCR 6899

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2903.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2910.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-192 rewrote par. (2) which had read as follows: “(2) The Mayor, Council, Superintendent/CEO, Board of Education and the Emergency Transitional Education Board of Trustees shall use their best efforts to obtain temporary supplemental funding from other revenue sources.”

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-2901.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 38-2901.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).